Illinois, session 104th, HB2773.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Nursing Home Care Act is amended by 5changing Section 3-711 as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 45/3-711)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 4153-711)7    Sec. 3-711. The Department, at its expense, shall provide 8a stenographer to take the testimony, or otherwise record the 9testimony, and preserve a record of all proceedings under this 10Section. The notice of hearing, the complaint and all other 11documents in the nature of pleadings and written motions filed 12in the proceedings, the transcript of testimony, and the 13findings and decision shall be the record of the proceedings. 14The Department shall furnish a transcript of such record to 15any person interested in such hearing upon payment therefor of 16$3 70 cents per page for each original transcript and 75 25 17cents per page for each certified copy thereof. However, the 18charge for any part of such transcript ordered and paid for 19previous to the writing of the original record shall be 75 25 20cents per page.21(Source: P.A. 81-223.)